North Carolina, session 2025, SB752.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-375.2(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Local boards of education shall adopt a policy authorizing a student with asthma or a
student subject to anaphylactic reactions, or both, to possess and self-administer asthma
medication on school property during the school day, at school-sponsored activities, or while in
transit to or from school or school-sponsored events. As used in this section, "asthma medication"
means a medicine prescribed for the treatment of asthma or anaphylactic reactions and includes
a prescribed asthma inhaler or epinephrine auto-injector. product. The policy shall include a
requirement that the student's parent or guardian provide to the school:
…."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-375.2A reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-375.2A. School supply of epinephrine auto-injectors.products.
(a) A local board of education shall provide for a supply of emergency epinephrine
auto-injectorsproducts on school property for use by trained school personnel to provide
emergency medical aid to persons suffering from an anaphylactic reaction during the school day
and at school-sponsored events on school property. Each school shall store in a secure but
unlocked and easily accessible location a minimum of two epinephrine auto-injectors.products.
For purposes of this section, "school property" does not include transportation to or from school.
(b) For the purposes of this section and G.S. 115C-375.2, "epinephrine
auto-injector"product" means a disposable drug delivery system with a spring-activated,
concealed needle that is designed for emergency administration of epinephrine to provide rapid,
convenient first aid for persons suffering a potentially fatal reaction to anaphylaxis.anaphylaxis,
including nasal sprays and injectors with a spring-activated, concealed needle.
(c) The principal shall designate one or more school personnel, as part of the medical
care program under G.S. 115C-375.1, to receive initial training and annual retraining from a
school nurse or qualified representative of the local health department regarding the storage and
emergency use of an epinephrine auto-injector.products. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the school nurse or other designated school personnel who has received
training under this subsection shall obtain a non-patient specific prescription for an epinephrine
auto-injectorsproduct from a physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner of the local
health department serving the area in which the local school administrative unit is located.
*S752-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) The principal shall collaborate with appropriate school personnel to develop an
emergency action plan for the use of epinephrine auto-injectorsproducts in an emergency. The
plan shall include at least the following components:
(1) Standards and procedures for the storage and emergency use of epinephrine
auto-injectorsproducts by trained school personnel.
(2) Training of school personnel in recognizing symptoms of anaphylaxis.
(3) Emergency follow-up procedures, including calling emergency services and
contacting a student's parent and physician.
(4) Instruction and certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
(e) A supply of emergency epinephrine auto-injectorsproducts provided in accordance
with this section shall not be used as the sole medication supply for students known to have a
medical condition requiring the availability or use of an epinephrine auto-injector.product. Those
students may be authorized to possess and self-administer their medication on school property
under G.S. 115C-375.2.
…."
SECTION 2.(a) 115C-218.75(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.75. General operating requirements.
(a) Health and Safety Standards. – A charter school shall meet the same health and safety
requirements required of a local school administrative unit.unit, including the following:
(1) The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that charter schools provide
parents and guardians with information about meningococcal meningitis and
influenza and their vaccines at the beginning of every school year. This
information shall include the causes, symptoms, and how meningococcal
meningitis and influenza are spread and the places where parents and
guardians may obtain additional information and vaccinations for their
children.
(2) The Department of Public Instruction shall also ensure that charter schools
provide parents and guardians with information about cervical cancer, cervical
dysplasia, human papillomavirus, and the vaccines available to prevent these
diseases. This information shall be provided at the beginning of the school
year to parents of children entering grades five through 12. This information
shall include the causes and symptoms of these diseases, how they are
transmitted, how they may be prevented by vaccination, including the benefits
and possible side effects of vaccination, and the places where parents and
guardians may obtain additional information and vaccinations for their
children.
(3) The Department of Public Instruction shall also ensure that charter schools
provide students in grades seven through 12 with information annually on the
preventable risks for preterm birth in subsequent pregnancies, including
induced abortion, smoking, alcohol consumption, the use of illicit drugs, and
inadequate prenatal care.
(4) The Department of Public Instruction shall also ensure that charter schools
provide students in grades nine through 12 with information annually on the
manner in which a parent may lawfully abandon a newborn baby with a
responsible person, in accordance with Article 5A of Chapter 7B of the
General Statutes.
(5) The Department of Public Instruction shall also ensure that the guidelines for
individual diabetes care plans adopted by the State Board of Education under
G.S. 115C-12(31) are implemented in charter schools in which students with
diabetes are enrolled and that charter schools otherwise comply with
G.S. 115C-375.3.
Page 2 Senate Bill 752-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that charter schools comply
with G.S. 115C-375.2A. The board of directors of a charter school shall
provide the school with a supply of emergency epinephrine
auto-injectorsproducts necessary to meet the requirements of
G.S. 115C-375.2A."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-238.66(7) reads as rewritten:
"(7) Health and safety. – The board of directors shall require that the regional
school meet the same health and safety standards required of a local school
administrative unit.
The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that regional schools
comply with G.S. 115C-375.2A. The board of directors of a regional school
shall provide the school with a supply of emergency epinephrine
auto-injectorsproducts necessary to carry out the provisions of
G.S. 115C-375.2A."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.

Senate Bill 752-First Edition Page 3